Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 11
IMPOSITION OF SENTENCE

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

riminal Law", which discusses Tenth

C

ircuit decisions dealing with questions of criminal sentencing, see 63 Den. U. L. Rev. 291 (1986); for article, "Felony Sentencing in Colorado", see 18 Colo. Law. 1689 (1989); for article, "Criminal Sentencing" which discusses Tenth Circuit decisions dealing with criminal sentencing, see 67 Den. U. L. Rev. 727 (1990); for article, "1990 Criminal Law Legislative Update", see 19 Colo. Law. 2049 (1990); for article, "Colorado Felony Sentencing: Law and Practice", see 24 Colo. Law. 2669 (1995).

Section

PART 1 ALTERNATIVES - INVESTIGATION

PART 2 PROBATION

PART 3 SENTENCES TO IMPRISONMENT

PART 4 DEATH PENALTY - EXECUTION

PART 5 SENTENCES TO PAYMENT
OF FINES - COSTS

PART 6 RIGHT TO ATTEND SENTENCING

PART 7 COMMUNITY OR USEFUL
PUBLIC SERVICE

PART 8 APPLICABILITY OF PROCEDURE
IN CLASS 1 FELONY CASES
FOR CRIMES COMMITTED ON OR
AFTER JULY 1, 1988, AND PRIOR
TO SEPTEMBER 20, 1991

PART 9 REPEAL OF THE DEATH PENALTY